Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321E.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) The department may issue all-systems permits under section 321E.8 which are valid for movement on all paved highways or streets primary roads and secondary roads, including roads designated by a local authority as a truck route , except the interstate road system if prohibited under section 321E.8 , and except any highways or streets under the jurisdiction of local authorities upon which an all-systems permit is road designated by the applicable local authority as not valid as determined by the applicable local authority for use by permitted vehicles if the local authority indicates such highways and streets communicates the not-valid designation to the department in writing, including by means of electronic communication. However, all roads designated as not valid are subject to review by the department, and a local authority shall not determine that any paved farm-to-market road, or highway or street road designated as a truck route, is not valid for purposes of an all-systems permit without justification. A highway or street under the jurisdiction of a local authority upon which movement under an all-systems permit is valid shall connect with a highway or street under House File 979, p. 2 the jurisdiction of the state, or with another highway or street upon which movement under an all-systems permit is valid that ultimately connects with a highway or street under the jurisdiction of the state. (2) A local authority that indicates determines a highway or street, including a paved farm-to-market road, secondary road, or road designated as a truck route upon which an all-systems permit is not valid under subparagraph (1) shall provide a written justification report to the department explaining the local authorityâs determination in accordance with subparagraph (1) . If the department disagrees with the local authorityâs determination, the dispute shall be resolved in accordance with chapter 17A rules adopted by the department . (3) Notwithstanding a local authorityâs determination under this paragraph, a person who is issued an all-systems permit may operate a permitted vehicle over the most direct route between the location where the vehicle is loaded or is to be unloaded and the nearest highway or street upon which movement under an all-systems permit is valid. If all roads leading to and from a loading or unloading location used by a permitted vehicle are designated as not valid, a local authority shall cooperate with the department to find an alternate route for the permitted vehicle over the shortest practicable distance. (4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement and administer this paragraph. Sec. 2. Section 321E.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. Vehicles with indivisible or divisible loads having an overall width not to exceed the width authorized under section 321.454 , an overall length not to exceed the length authorized under section 321.457 , an overall height not to exceed the height authorized under section 321.456 , and a total gross weight not to exceed the gross weight authorized under section 321.463 by more than twelve and one-half percent, may operate under an all-systems permit and shall obtain route approval from the department. Permitted vehicles under this subsection with a gross weight exceeding eighty thousand pounds shall not be allowed to travel on any portion of the interstate road system. House File 979, p. 3 Sec. 3. Section 321E.9, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 4. Section 321E.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. A vehicle traveling under permit shall be registered for the gross weight of the vehicle and load. A trip permit issued according to section 326.23 shall not be used in lieu of the registration provided for in this section . b. For purposes of this section, a vehicle traveling under a single-trip permit issued under section 321E.9 may be registered with the department for the combined gross weight of the vehicle and load on a single-trip basis. The fee for single-trip registration is four dollars per ton exceeding forty tons. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 979, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor